Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3266.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. If, on or before December 31, 2026, Charlie’s Oil Co., Inc., qualified on
December 26, 1978, shall file any corporation tax returns as may be required, and shall pay all
taxes which were due or should have been due to the state, and shall file with the secretary of state
a certificate signed by the tax administrator that such tax returns and such taxes have been paid;
and shall also file all reports and pay all fees which may be required by the secretary of state, then
the revocation of the charter of said corporation shall thereupon to wit, upon the filing of said
certificate, said reports and the payment of said fees, be vacated and said corporation shall
thereupon be entitled to all privileges, benefits and powers and subject to all of the same duties and
liabilities as though no revocation of its charter had taken place.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006353
========